Massachusetts, session 194th, H1495.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 23B of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 24B the following section:-
Section 23C. The executive office of housing and livable communities, in coordination
with the department of energy resources, shall, subject to appropriation, operate an annual
extreme heat energy assistance program to provide assistance in paying the energy bills of
residents of Massachusetts earning no greater than 150 per cent of the federal poverty guideline,
as defined by the federal government, or no greater than 60 per cent of the state median income
level, whichever is greater, and of residents who are already found eligible for the Low-income
Home Energy Assistance Program, during the period of May 15 to September 30. Said program
may be administered in coordination with the Low-income Home Energy Assistance Act, 42
United States Code sections 8621 et seq., or any successor acts thereto, subject to the following
provisions:
of 2

(a) the executive office shall establish benefit rates and maximum benefits such that total
benefits paid do not exceed the amount appropriated for this benefit; and
(b) the executive office shall use the same grantee agencies, similar applications and
similar verification procedures as are used in the Low Income Home Energy Assistance
Program, to the maximum extent possible. The executive office may also utilize a reasonable
percentage of any funds appropriated, not exceeding 10 per cent of such funds, for administrative
costs of the program.
SECTION 2. The executive office of housing and livable communities shall promulgate
rules and regulations to implement the provisions of section 23C of chapter 23B of the general
laws, as inserted by this act, no later than 6 months following the effective date of this act.
of 2